Montana, session 2025, HB793.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 44-4-402, MCA, is amended to read:
"44-4-402. Membership -- composition. (1) The council consists of no more than 13 voting
members appointed by the governor in accordance with 2-15-124 and as provided in this section.
(2) Membership must include:
(a) one state government law enforcement representative;
(b) one chief of police, who may be appointed based on recommendations from the Montana
association of chiefs of police;
(c) one sheriff, who may be appointed based on recommendations from the Montana sheriffs and
peace officers association;
(d) one representative from the department of corrections established in 2-15-2301;
(e) one local law enforcement officer in a nonadministrative position, who may be appointed based
on recommendations from the Montana police protective association;
(f) one detention center administrator or detention officer;
(g) one Montana-certified tribal law enforcement representative;
(h) one county attorney, who may be appointed based on recommendations from the Montana
county attorneys association;
(i) two members one member of the board of crime control established in 2-15-2008;
(j) one public safety communications officer as defined in 7-31-201 who may be appointed based
on recommendations from the Montana chapter of the association of public-safety communications officials;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 793
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 793
(j)(k) one misdemeanor probation officer, as defined in 46-23-1001, who is certified by the Montana
public safety officer standards and training council and who may be appointed based on recommendations from
an association representing misdemeanor probation officers; and
(k)(l) two Montana citizens at large who are informed and experienced in the subject of law
enforcement."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 793
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 793, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 793
INTRODUCED BY G. KMETZ
AN ACT REVISING THE MEMBERSHIP OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER STANDARDS AND TRAINING
COUNCIL; AMENDING SECTION 44-4-402, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”